Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2052.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXVIII-J12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 INTERNAL AUDITINGSection 2801-J. Scope of article.This article relates to internal auditing to assist Commonwealth agencies.Section 2802-J. Purpose.The purpose of this article is to establish guidelines for a program of internal auditing to assist each Commonwealth agency by furnishing independent analyses, appraisals and recommendations about the adequacy and effectiveness of the Commonwealth agency's system of internal control policies and procedures and the quality of performance in carrying out assigned responsibilities.Section 2803-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrator." The executive head or governing board or authority of a Commonwealth agency."Assurance services." As follows:(1) Activities that are designed to help accomplish objectives by bringing a systematic and disciplined approach to evaluate and improve risk management, control or governance processes.(2) The term includes an audit."Audit." Any of the following:(1) A financial audit.(2) A compliance audit.(3) An operational audit.(4) An effectiveness audit.(5) An investigation.20250HB2052PN2630 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Commonwealth agency." Any of the following:(1) A department, agency, office, bureau, commission, board, division or other entity or officer of the executive branch of the Commonwealth. The term includes any of the following:(i) The Office of the Governor.(ii) The Office of the Lieutenant Governor.(iii) The Office of Attorney General.(iv) The Department of the Auditor General.(v) The Treasury Department.(vi) An independent agency, as defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(vii) An organization established by the Constitution of Pennsylvania, a statute or an executive order that performs or is intended to perform an essential governmental function.(2) A judicial agency, as defined in section 102 of the Right-to-Know Law.(3) A legislative agency, as defined in section 102 of the Right-to-Know Law."Compliance audit." An audit to determine if:(1) The audited entity has obligated, expended, received and used State money in accordance with the purpose for which that money has been appropriated or otherwise authorized by law.(2) The audited entity has obligated, expended, received and used State money in accordance with any limitations, restrictions, conditions or mandatory directions imposed by law on those obligations, expenditures, receipts or uses.20250HB2052PN2630 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The records, books and accounts of the audited entity fairly and accurately reflect its financial and fiscal operations relating to the obligation, receipt, expenditure and use of State money or money represented as being collected for a State purpose.(4) The collections of State revenues and receipts by the audited entity are in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.(5) Money or negotiable securities or similar assets handled by the audited entity on behalf of the State or received from the State and held in trust by the audited entity have been properly and legally administered."Consulting services." As follows:(1) Advisory and related client service activities, the nature and scope of which are agreed upon with the client and are designed to add value and improve operations.(2) The term includes counsel, advice, facilitation and training."Effectiveness audit." An audit to determine, according to established or designated program objectives, responsibilities or duties, statutes and regulations, program performance criteria or program evaluation standards, if:(1) The objectives and intended benefits are being achieved efficiently and effectively.(2) The program duplicates, overlaps or conflicts with another State program."Financial audit." An audit to determine if:(1) The records, books and accounts of the audited entity accurately reflect its financial and fiscal operations.20250HB2052PN2630 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The audited entity is maintaining effective accounting control over revenues, obligations, expenditures, assets and liabilities.(3) The accounting and recordkeeping of collections of State revenues and receipts by the audited entity are fair, accurate and in accordance with law.(4) The accounting and recordkeeping of money or negotiable securities or similar assets handled by the audited entity and held in trust by the audited entity are proper, accurate and in accordance with law.(5) Financial, program and statistical reports of the audited entity are fairly presented."Internal auditing." An independent and objective analysis of business practices and activities through assurance services or consulting services, or both."Internal auditor." An individual appointed to conduct a program of internal auditing under this article."Investigation." An inquiry into:(1) specified acts or allegations of impropriety, malfeasance or nonfeasance in the obligation, expenditure, receipt or use of State money; or(2) specified financial transactions or practices that may involve impropriety, malfeasance or nonfeasance in the obligation, expenditure, receipt or use of State money."Operational audit." An audit to determine:(1) If the audited entity is managing or utilizing resources, including State funds, personnel, property, equipment and space, in an economical and efficient manner.(2) Causes of inefficiencies or uneconomical practices, including inadequacies in management information systems, 20250HB2052PN2630 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 internal and administrative procedures, organizational structure, use of resources, allocation of personnel, purchasing, policies and equipment.(3) If financial, program and statistical reports of the audited entity contain useful data and are fairly presented.Section 2804-J. Internal auditing.(a) Requirement.--A Commonwealth agency shall conduct a program of internal auditing that includes:(1) An annual audit plan that is prepared using risk assessment techniques and that identifies the individual audits to be conducted during the year.(2) Periodic audits of the agency's major systems and controls, including:(i) Accounting systems and controls.(ii) Administrative systems and controls.(iii) Electronic data processing systems and controls.(b) Consideration.--In conducting the program of internal auditing under subsection (a), the Commonwealth agency shall consider methods for ensuring compliance with contract processes and controls and for monitoring contracts.(c) Internal auditor.--(1) The administrator of a Commonwealth agency shall appoint an internal auditor to conduct the program of internal auditing under this article.(2) An internal auditor shall:(i) Be a certified public accountant, certified internal auditor, certified management accountant, certified global management accountant or certified fraud examiner.20250HB2052PN2630 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Have at least three years of auditing experience.(iii) Be currently licensed or certified and be in good standing with the respective licensing board during the period in which the individual is engaged in auditing as an internal auditor.(d) Additional staff.--A Commonwealth agency shall employ additional professional and support staff that the administrator of the Commonwealth agency determines necessary to implement an effective program of internal auditing.(e) Resources.--The administrator of a Commonwealth agency shall periodically review the resources dedicated to the program of internal auditing and determine if adequate resources exist to ensure that risks identified in the annual risk assessment are adequately covered within a reasonable time frame.Section 2805-J. Duties of internal auditor.(a) Specific duties.--An internal auditor of a Commonwealth agency shall:(1) Report directly to the administrator of the Commonwealth agency.(2) Develop an annual audit plan for the Commonwealth agency.(3) Conduct audits as specified in the audit plan and document deviations.(4) Prepare audit reports.(5) As follows:(i) Conduct quality assurance reviews in accordance with:(A) The standards for the professional practice of internal auditing in effect upon the effective 20250HB2052PN2630 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 date of this section.(B) The Code of Ethics contained in the Professional Practices Framework as promulgated by the Institute of Internal Auditors in effect upon the effective date of this section.(C) Generally accepted government auditing standards.(ii) Periodically take part in a comprehensive external peer review.(6) Conduct operational audits and other audits as directed by the administrator of the Commonwealth agency.(b) Administration.--A program of internal auditing conducted by a Commonwealth agency shall provide for the internal auditor of the Commonwealth agency to:(1) Have access to the administrator of the Commonwealth agency.(2) Be free of all operational and management responsibilities that would impair the internal auditor's ability to review independently all aspects of the operations of the Commonwealth agency.Section 2806-J. Audit plans and audit reports.(a) Audit plan.--The annual audit plan developed by an internal auditor of a Commonwealth agency must be approved by the administrator of the Commonwealth agency.(b) Audit report.--An audit report for a Commonwealth agency shall be reviewed by the administrator of the Commonwealth agency.Section 2807-J. Annual reports.(a) Requirement.--No later than each November 1, an internal auditor of a Commonwealth agency shall prepare an annual report 20250HB2052PN2630 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the program of internal auditing of the Commonwealth agency.(b) Form.--The Auditor General shall prescribe the proposed form of the annual reports.(c) Submittal.--Each report under this section shall be submitted to:(1) The Governor.(2) The Auditor General.(3) The administrator of the Commonwealth agency.(4) The members of the General Assembly.Section 2808-J. Periodic audits, action plans and responses.(a) Requirement.--A Commonwealth agency shall submit a copy of the following to the entities specified in section 2807-J(c)(1), (2) and (4):(1) A periodic audit performed by the internal auditor of the Commonwealth agency, no later than 30 days after the date that the internal auditor submits the periodic audit to the administrator of the Commonwealth agency.(2) An action plan or other response issued by the administrator of the Commonwealth agency in response to a report from the internal auditor of the Commonwealth agency, no later than 30 days after the action plan or other response is prepared.(b) Compelling information.--If the Commonwealth agency fails to submit the information specified in this section, an entity specified under section 2807-J(c)(1), (2) and (4) may take appropriate action to compel the submittal of the information.Section 2809-J. Consultations.An internal auditor of a Commonwealth agency may consult the administrator of the Commonwealth agency, the Office of the 20250HB2052PN2630 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Governor, the Auditor General or any other Commonwealth agency about matters affecting duties or responsibilities under this article.Section 2810-J. Professional development.(a) Assistance.--The Auditor General may make available and coordinate a program of training and technical assistance to:(1) Ensure that internal auditors have access to current information about internal audit techniques, policies and procedures.(2) Provide general technical and audit assistance to internal auditors upon request.(b) Reimbursement.--The Auditor General shall be entitled to reimbursement for the costs associated with providing the services under this section under the terms of interagency cooperation contracts negotiated between the Auditor General and each Commonwealth agency.Section 2811-J. Risk assessment.(a) Applicability.--In lieu of the procedures specified in sections 2804-J, 2805-J, 2806-J, 2807-J, 2808-J, 2809-J and 2810-J, a Commonwealth agency may opt instead to comply with this section if the Commonwealth agency:(1) has an annual operating budget that is less than $10,000,000;(2) has fewer than 100 full-time equivalent employees; or(3) receives and processes less than $10,000,000 in cash in a fiscal year.(b) Requirement.--Each year, a Commonwealth agency shall conduct a formal risk assessment consisting of an executive management review of functions, activities and processes of the 20250HB2052PN2630 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth agency.(c) Conditions.--A risk assessment under this section shall:(1) Evaluate the probability of occurrence and the likely effect of financial, managerial and compliance risks and of risks related to the use of information technology.(2) Rank risks according to the probability of occurrence and likely effect of the risks evaluated.(d) Submittal.--The Commonwealth agency shall submit a report on the risk assessment to the Auditor General in the form and at the time prescribed by the Auditor General.(e) Evaluation.--Based on risk assessment, the Auditor General shall:(1) Evaluate each report submitted under this section.(2) Identify Commonwealth agencies under this section with significant financial, managerial or compliance risk or significant risk related to the use of information technology.(3) Recommend to the administrator of a Commonwealth agency identified under paragraph (2) that the Commonwealth agency obtain an audit to address the significant risks identified by the Auditor General.(f) Duties of administrator.--The administrator of a Commonwealth agency identified under subsection (e)(2) may order the Commonwealth agency to:(1) Obtain an audit under governmental auditing standards.(2) Submit reports and action plans as prescribed by section 2808-J.(3) Report to the Auditor General on the status of the Commonwealth agency's implementation of audit recommendations 20250HB2052PN2630 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the form and addressing issues as prescribed by the Auditor General.Section 2812-J. Publication.(a) Requirement.--Consistent with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, a Commonwealth agency shall post on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Commonwealth agency:(1) The Commonwealth agency's audit plan under section 2806-J.(2) The Commonwealth agency's annual reports under section 2807-J.(b) Updates.--A Commonwealth agency shall update the posting required under this section to include:(1) A detailed summary of the weaknesses, deficiencies, wrongdoings or other concerns, if any, raised by the audit plan or annual report of the Commonwealth agency.(2) A summary of the action taken by the Commonwealth agency to address the concerns, if any, that are raised by the audit plan or annual report of the Commonwealth agency.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2052PN2630 - 12 - 1234567891011121314151617181920